src/fst/morphology/stems/adpositions.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! North Saami adposition lexicon
!      ==============================

!! First come the 3 continuation lexica, the division is based on Nickel
!! and should probably be revised. Then comes the adpositions themselves.
!! The uninflecting ones are pointed to the 3 tag lexica, the Px ones to the
!! Px lexica in sme-lex.txt and closed-sme-lex.txt.


LEXICON Pp   !!= * **@CODE@** gives both +Po and +Pr
+Po: K ;         !NOTLEMMA
+Pr: K ;         !NOTLEMMA
! +Adp: K ; !Let's try this instead.

LEXICON Pp-Err   !!= * **@CODE@** gives both +Po and +Pr
+Po+Err/Orth: K ;         !NOTLEMMA
+Pr+Err/Orth: K ;         !NOTLEMMA



LEXICON Postp   !!= * **@CODE@** gives +Po
+Po: K ;        !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON Postp-Err   !!= * **@CODE@** gives +Po
+Po+Err/Orth: K ;        !NOTLEMMA


LEXICON Prep   !!= * **@CODE@** gives +Pr
+Pr: K ;        !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON Prep-Err   !!= * **@CODE@** gives +Pr
+Pr+Err/Orth: K ;        !NOTLEMMA

LEXICON Adposition   !!= * **@CODE@** is the lexicon with the adpositions
ala Postp ;
alde Postp ;
alde+Use/NG:aldi Postp ;
alu Postp ;
asu Postp ;
álggogeahčai:álggo#geahčai Pp ; !
álggogeahčai+Err/Orth:álggu#geahčai Pp ;
álggogeahčen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:álgo#geahčen Pp ;
álggogeahčen+Err/Orth:álgo#geažin Pp ;
badjel Pp ;
badjelaččas Pp ;
badjelii Pp ; ! Ill
badjelis Pp ; ! Loc
bajil Pp ;
bajábealde+Err/Orth-a-á:baja#bealde Pp ;
bajábeale:bajá#beal Pp-Err ; !
bajábeale:bajá#beale Pp ;
bajábeallai:bajá#beallai Pp ;
bakte Postp ;
bakte:bakto Postp-Err ; !
bealde+Err/Orth:beald9 Pp ;
bealde+Use/NG:bealdi Pp ; ! xxx check Finland
beales Postp ;
beali Postp ;
bealis Postp ;
beallai Pp ;
bearrái Postp ;
belos Postp ;
birra Pp ;
boaššul Pp ;
bokte Postp ;
bokti Postp ;
bottain Postp ;
boššolii Pp ;
boššolis Pp ;
buohta Postp ;
buorrin Postp ;
báldal Postp ;
báldda Postp ;
bálddas Postp ;
bálddas+Err/Orth-a-á:balddas Postp ;
báldii Postp ;
báldii+Err/Orth:báldi Postp ;
bále Postp ;
báli Postp ;
báras Postp ;
bárrii Postp ;
dabbeliidda Pp ;
dabbil Pp ;
dassái Postp ;
dassái+Err/Orth-a-á:dassai Postp ;
davvelaččas Pp ;
davvelii Pp ;
davvelis Pp ;
davvenuorttabealde:davve#nuortta#bealde Pp ;
davvenuorttabeale:davve#nuortta#beale Pp ;
davvenuorttabeallai:davve#nuortta#beallai Pp ;
davveoarjjabealde:davve#oarjja#bealde Pp ;
davveoarjjabeale+Use/NG:davve#oarjja#beali Pp ;
davveoarjjabeallai+Use/NG:davve#oarjja#beallái Pp ;
davveoarjjábeale:davve#oarjjá#beale Pp ;
davveoarjjábeallai:davve#oarjjá#beallai Pp ;
davveviestarbealde:davve#viestar#bealde Pp ;
davveviestarbeale:davve#viestar#beale Pp ;
davveviestarbeallai+Use/NG:davve#viestar#beallái Pp ;
davvil Pp ;
davábeale:davá#beale Pp ;
davábeale+Use/NG:davá#beali Pp ;
davábeallai+Use/NG:davá#beallái Pp ;
davágeaže:davá#geaže Pp ;
diebbelaččas Pp ;
diebbelii Pp ;
diebbelis Pp ;
dihte:dihti Postp-Err ;
dihte+v1:dihte Postp ;
dihte+v2:dihtii Postp ;
dobbelačča Pp ;
dobbelažžii Pp ;
dobbeliidda Pp ;
dobbil Pp ;
duobbelaččas Pp ;
duobbelii Pp ;
duobbelis Pp ;
duoge Postp ;
duogi Postp ;
duogábealde:duoga#bealde Pp-Err ;
duogábealde:duogá#bealde Pp ;
duogábeale:duogá#beal Pp-Err ; !
duogábeale+Use/NG:duogá#beali Pp ;
duohkai Postp ;
duohken Postp ;
duohkin Postp ;
duohkái Postp ;  ! Turi
dábbelačča Pp ;
dábbelažžii Pp ;
dábbelii Pp ;
dábbil Pp ;
dáfos Postp ;
dáfus Postp ;
dáfus:dáfun Postp-Err ; ! !SOUTH
dássá Postp ;
earet Prep ;
earret Prep ;
earret:earrát Prep-Err ;
ektui Postp ;
fárrui Postp ;
fárrui+Err/Orth-a-á:farrui Postp ;
fárus Postp ;
fárus+Err/Orth-a-á:farus Postp ;
fávlelaččas Pp ;
fávlelii Pp ;
fávlelis Pp ;
galju Postp ;
gaskal Pp ;
gaskii Postp ;
gaskii:gaskkii Postp-Err ;
gaskka Postp ;
gaskka:gaska Postp-Err ;
gaskkal Prep ;
gaskkas Postp ;
gaskkas+Err/Orth:gaskas Postp ;
gasku Pp ;
gasu Postp ;
geahčai Pp ;
geahčen Postp ;
geahčen+Err/Orth:geahččen Postp ;
geaže Pp ;
geažil Pp ;
gievrru Postp ;
gieđas Postp ;
goabbil Pp ;
goris Postp ;
gorrái Postp ;
govddu Postp ;
guhkkut Pp ;
guhku Postp ;
guhku:guhko Postp-Err ;
gullut Postp ;
gulu Postp ;
guoktil Prep ;
guora Postp ;
guoras Postp ;
guotkku Postp ;
guovddáš Pp ;
guovdelaš Pp ;
guovdu:guovdo Pp-Err ;
gurrii Postp ;
gurut% bealde:gurut% bealde Pp ;
gurut% beale:gurut% beali Pp ;
gurut% beallai:gurut% beallái Pp ;
gáddelačča Pp ;
gáddelažžii Pp ;
gáddeliidda Pp ;
gáddil Pp ;
gárdemađe:gárde#mađe Prep ;
gárdemađi:gárde#mađi Prep ;
haga Postp ; ! awaiting Sub + dis rules for a possible haga+?r. Returning to this, TT.
haga+Err/Orth:gehtte Postp ;
háldui Postp ;
hárrái:hárráj Pp ;
ijabeallai+Use/NG:ija#beallái Pp ;
jelgii Postp ;
labi Pp ;
lahka Pp ;
lassin Postp ;
loahpageahčai:loahpa#geahčai Pp ;
loahpageahčen:loahpa#geahčen Pp ;
loahpageahčen+Err/Orth:loahpa#geažin Pp ;
losu Postp ;
luhtte Postp ;
luhtte+Use/NG:luhtti Postp ; ! xxx check Finland
lullelačča Pp ;
lullelažžii Pp ;
lulleliidda Pp ;
lullil Pp ;
lulábeale:lulá#beale Pp ;
lulábeallai:lulá#beallai Pp ;
lulágeahčen:lulá#geahčen Pp ;
lulábealde+Err/Orth-a-á:lula#bealde Pp ;
lulábeale+Err/Orth-a-á:lula#beali Pp ;
lulábeallai+Err/Orth-a-á:lula#beallái Pp ;
lulágeaže+Err/Orth-a-á:lula#geaže Pp ;
lusa Postp ;
ládje Postp ;
ládjii Postp ;
láhkai Postp ;
mano Postp ;
manu Postp ;
mađe Postp ;
mađe+Err/Orth-a-á:máđe Postp ;
mađi Postp ;
mađo Postp ;
mađu Postp ;
maŋil Postp "from behind" ;
maŋis Postp "behind" ;
maŋábeallai:maŋá#beallai Postp ;
maŋábeallai+Err/Orth-a-á:maŋa#beallái Postp ; 
maŋŋegeahčen:maŋŋe#geahčen Pp ;
maŋŋel+Use/NG:mannjel Pp ; !dialectal form
maŋŋel+Use/NG:maŋŋil Pp "after" ;
maŋŋelaččas Postp ;
maŋŋá Pp ;
maŋŋái Postp ;
maŋŋái+Err/Orth-a-á:maŋŋai Postp ;
meaddil Pp ;
meattá Pp ;
miehtil Pp ;
miehtá+Err/Orth:miehtta Pp ;
miel Postp ;
mielas Postp ;
mielde Postp ;
mielde:mieldi Postp-Err ; !
mielde:melde Postp-Err ; !
muttos Postp ;
máddelaččas Pp ;
máddelii Pp ;
máddelis Pp ;
máttabealde:mátta#bealde Pp ;
máttanuorttabeale:mátta#nuortta#beale Pp ;
máttanuorttabeallai:mátta#nuortta#beallai Pp ;
máttanuorttageahčen:mátta#nuortta#geahčen Pp ;
máttaoarjjageahčen:mátta#oarjja#geahčen Pp ;
máttábealde:máttá#bealde Pp ;
máttábeale+Use/NG:máttá#beali Pp ;
máttábeallai+Use/NG:máttá#beallái Pp ;
nala Postp ;
nalde Postp ;
namas Postp ;
nammii Postp ;
njeaiga Postp ;
njeaigga Postp ;
nuortadavábealde:nuorta#davá#bealde Pp ;
nuortadavábeale+Use/NG:nuorta#davá#beali Pp ;
nuortadavábeallai+Use/NG:nuorta#davá#beallái Pp ;
nuortal Pp ;
nuortalaččas Pp ;
nuortalii Pp ;
nuortalis Pp ;
nuortalulábeale:nuorta#lulá#beale Pp ;
nuortalulábeallai:nuorta#lulá#beallai Pp ;
nuortalulágeaže:nuorta#lulá#geaže Pp ;
nuortelaččas Pp ;
nuortelii Pp ;
nuortelis Pp ;
nuorttabealde:nuortta#bealde Pp ;
nuorttabeale+Err/Orth:nuortta#beal Pp ;
nuorttabeallai:nuortta#beallai Pp ;
nuorttageahčen:nuortta#geahčen Pp ;
oaidnut Pp ;
oaivái Postp ;
oarjedavábeale:oarje#davá#beale Pp ;
oarjedavábeallai:oarje#davá#beallai Pp ;
oarjedavágeaže:oarje#davá#geaže Pp ;
oarjelaččas Pp ;
oarjelii Pp ;
oarjelis Pp ;
oarjjabealde:oarjja#bealde Pp ;
oarjjabeale:oarjja#beali Pp ;
oarjjabeallai:oarjja#beallái Pp ;
oarjjageaže:oarjja#geaže Pp ;
oarjjábeale:oarjjá#beale Pp ;
oarjjábeallai:oarjjá#beallai Pp ;
oarjjágeahčen:oarjjá#geahčen Pp ;
olgeš% bealde:olgeš% bealde Pp ;
olgeš% beale:olgeš% beali Pp ;
olgeš% beallai:olgeš% beallái Pp ;
olggil Postp ;
olggobeale:olggo#beale Pp ;
olggobeallai:olggo#beallai Pp ;
olggul Postp ;
olgolaččas Pp ;
olgolii Pp ;
olgolis Pp ;
olis Pp ;
ollodahkii Postp ;
oskálii Postp ;
ovdal Pp ;
ovdalaččas  Postp ;
ovdalis Postp ;
ovdasii Postp ;
maŋábealde:maŋá#bealde Pp ; !
ovddabeale:ovdda#beale Pp ;
ovddabeale+Use/NG:ovdda#beali Postp ;
ovddabeallai+Po+Err/Orth-a-á:ovdda#beallái Pp ;
maŋábeallai:maŋá#beallai Pp ;
ovddal Postp ;
ovddas Postp ;
ovddas:ovddan Postp-Err ; ! !SOUTH
ovdii Postp ;
ovdii+Err/Orth:ovddii Postp ;
rastá Pp ;
rádjai Postp ;
rádjai+Use/NG:rádjái Postp ;
ráigge Postp ; ! FMT: Also Adv, sme-fin
ráje Postp ;
rájes Postp ;
rájes+Use/NG:rájis Postp ;
rájes:rájes Postp ;
ráji Postp ;
rájiin Postp ;
sadjái Postp ;
sajes Postp ;
sajis Postp ;
seagis Postp ;
seahká Postp ;
sealggebealde:sealgge#bealde Pp ;
searvvis Postp ;
searvái Postp ;
sisa Postp ;
siskelačča Pp ;
siskelažžii Pp ;
siskeliidda Pp ;
siskkabealde:siskka#bealde Pp ;
siskkabeale:siskka#beal Pp-Err ; !
siskkil Postp ;
siskkobealde:siskko#bealde Pp ;
siskkobeale:siskko#beal Pp-Err ; !
siskkobeale:siskko#beale Pp ;
siste Postp ;
sivas Pp ;
soggelis Pp ;
stuoru Postp ;
sukte Postp ;
taga Postp ; !
veagas Postp ;
veardde Pp ;
vehkii Postp ;
vehkiin Postp ;
vehkui Postp ;
viiddu Postp ;
viđa Postp ;
viđe Postp ;
viđá Postp ;
vulobeale:vulo#beal Pp-Err ; !
vulobeale:vulo#beale Pp ;
vuolde Postp ;
vuole Postp ;
vuoli Postp ;
vuolis Postp ;
vuolis:vuolin Postp-Err ; ! !SOUTH
vuollai Postp ;
vuollai+Use/NG:vuollái Postp ;
vuollel Pp ;
vuollelažžii Pp ;
vuollil Pp;
vuolábeale:vuolá#beal Pp-Err ; !
vuolábeallai+Use/NG:vuolá#beallái Pp ;
vuostá:vuosttá Pp-Err ;
vuostái Pp ;
vuođul Postp ;
vuođul:vuodul Postp-Err ;
várás Postp ;
váste Postp ;
áigge+Use/MT:áigge Postp ; ! FMT: Add for fin-sme MT
áigi Postp ;
čieŋu Postp ;
